Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 5. Vocational Education Account.

Sec. 37.10.200.
Vocational education account.

The vocational education account is created in the general fund.

The account consists of

appropriations made by the legislature to the account;

gifts, bequests, and contributions; and

income and earnings of the account.

Money in the vocational education account may be appropriated by the legislature to the state and political subdivisions of the state, including regional educational attendance areas and municipal school districts, for vocational education programs and courses approved by the commissioner of labor and workforce development in consultation with the commissioner of education and early development for any other public purpose.

Nothing in this section dedicates funds for a specific purpose.

In this section, “vocational education” includes vocational training programs and courses taught at the secondary and postsecondary level of education.

History.

(§ 3 ch 47 SLA 2008)